Nevada, session 83, SB239.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. On or before October 1, 2025, the Department
of Health and Human Services shall:
(a) Determine which services covered under Medicaid are
provided primarily to children with cancer or serious diseases that
predominantly affect children;
(b) Determine which of the services identified pursuant to
paragraph (a) are provided by a type of specialist provider of health
-
*SB239*

– 2 –
care for which there is a shortage in this State, including, without
limitation, by reviewing:
(1) The ratio of patients to specialist providers of health care
who provide services identified pursuant to paragraph (a) in this
State; and
(2) The median time it takes for a patient to see a specialist
provider of health care who provides a service identified pursuant to
paragraph (a) in this State; and
(c) Submit to the United States Secretary of Health and Human
Services a request to amend the Medicaid program to increase the
rate of reimbursement under Medicaid for:
(1) Each service identified pursuant to paragraph (a) by at
least 10 percent of the rate of reimbursement for the service on the
effective date of this act; and
(2) Each service identified pursuant to paragraph (b) by at
least an additional 10 percent of the rate of reimbursement for the
service on the effective date of this act.
2. The request submitted pursuant to paragraph (c) of
subsection 1 must be supported using methods for determining
reimbursement rates accepted by the Secretary.
3. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB239*